Vermont, session 2025-2026, H577.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. chapter 91, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card Program
§ 4691. VERMONT PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISCOUNT CARD
PROGRAM
(a) There is established the Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card
Program, administered by the Office of the State Treasurer, for the purpose of
pooling prescription drug purchasing power with other U.S. states and
territories and nongovernmental organizations. The Program shall be made
available to all Vermont residents.
(b)(1) To further the purposes of the Program, the State Treasurer may
cooperate with other U.S. states and territories, regional consortia, or
nongovernmental organizations, or a combination of these, to pool prescription
drug purchasing power to:
(A) reduce prescription drug costs;
(B) negotiate discounts with prescription drug manufacturers;
(C) centralize prescription drug purchasing; and
(D) establish volume discount contracting.
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 2 of 10
2026
(2) As used in subdivision (1)(D) of this subsection, “volume discount
contracting” means the negotiated purchase of a large quantity of a prescription
drug at a decreased cost.
(c) Monies received by the Program from transfers, gifts, grants, donations,
or any other source, including any monies provided to the State through a
cooperative arrangement authorized by this section, shall be deposited in the
Financial Literacy and Economic Empowerment Trust Fund established
pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 111 and shall be available to the Office of the State
Treasurer to defray costs associated with administering the Program.
(d) The amount paid for a prescription drug after application of the
Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card by an individual who is covered by
a health insurance plan, as defined in 8 V.S.A. § 4011, shall be attributed
toward the covered individual’s deductible and out-of-pocket responsibilities
in accordance with 8 V.S.A. § 4093 and section 3612 of this title.
(e) On or before January 15, 2028, and annually thereafter, the State
Treasurer shall submit a report to the House Committee on Health Care, the
Senate Committee on Health and Welfare, and the Governor detailing the
activities of the Program during the previous calendar year, including the
number of Vermont residents and pharmacies participating in the Program; the
amount of savings on prescription drug costs achieved; and the impact, if any,
of the Program on the viability of Vermont’s pharmacies.
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 3 of 10
2026
Sec. 2. 8 V.S.A. § 4093 is amended to read:
§ 4093. RETAIL PHARMACIES; FILLING OF PRESCRIPTIONS
* * *
(c)(1) A health insurer or pharmacy benefit manager shall permit a
participating network pharmacy to perform all pharmacy services within the
lawful scope of the profession of pharmacy as set forth in 26 V.S.A. chapter
36.
(2) A health insurer or pharmacy benefit manager shall not do any of the
following:
* * *
(F)(i) Exclude any amount paid by or on behalf of a covered
individual, including any third-party payment, financial assistance, discount,
discount card, coupon, or other reduction, regardless of whether the individual
purchased the drug with or without using coverage for the drug under any
health insurance plan, when calculating a covered individual’s contribution
toward:
(I) the out-of-pocket limits for prescription drug costs under
section 4092 of this title;
(II) the covered individual’s deductible, if any; or
(III) to the extent not inconsistent with Sec. 2707 of the Public
Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-6, the annual out-of-pocket maximums
applicable to the covered individual’s health benefit plan.
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 4 of 10
2026
(ii) The provisions of subdivision (i) of this subdivision (F)
relating to a third-party payment, financial assistance, discount, coupon, or
other reduction in out-of-pocket expenses made on behalf of a covered
individual shall only apply to a prescription drug:
(I) for which there is no generic drug or interchangeable
biological product, as those terms are defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4601; or
(II) for which there is a generic drug or interchangeable
biological product, as those terms are defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4601, but for
which the covered individual has obtained access through prior authorization, a
step therapy protocol, or the pharmacy benefit manager’s or health insurer’s
exceptions and appeals process.
(iii) The provisions of subdivision (i) of this subdivision (F) shall
apply to a high-deductible health plan only to the extent that it would not
disqualify the plan from eligibility for a health savings account pursuant to
26 U.S.C. § 223.
(iv) In order to facilitate the appropriate attribution of amounts
paid by or on behalf of a covered individual pursuant to subdivision (i) of this
subdivision (F) for a covered individual who purchases a prescription drug
without using the prescription drug coverage available for the drug under the
covered individual’s health insurance plan, the health insurer or pharmacy
benefit manager, or both, shall:
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 5 of 10
2026
(I) make readily available on its website a downloadable proof
of payment form for a covered individual to use to submit proof of the actual
amount that the covered individual paid for the drug; and
(II) provide notice to all covered individuals at least annually
that they are responsible for providing proof of payment using the
downloadable proof of payment form or another mechanism, if the health
insurer or pharmacy benefit manager elects to make another mechanism
available for submitting proof of payment in addition to the downloadable
form, in order to have their spending properly attributed to their out-of-pocket
limits, deductible, and out-of-pocket maximums as set forth in subdivision (i)
of this subdivision (F).
* * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 3612 is amended to read:
§ 3612. PROHIBITED PRACTICES
* * *
(e)(1) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not require a covered person
purchasing a covered prescription drug to pay an amount greater than the lesser
of:
(A) the cost-sharing amount under the terms of the health benefit
plan, as determined in accordance with subdivision (2) of this subsection (e);
(B) the maximum allowable cost for the drug; or
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 6 of 10
2026
(C) the amount the covered person would pay for the drug if the
covered person were to pay the pharmacy’s usual and customary cash price,
after application of any known discounts, if the covered person were paying
the cash price instead of using the drug benefit; provided, however, that as
used in this subdivision (C), the term “discount” does not include a
prescription drug discount card or other third-party prescription drug benefit
program.
(2)(A) A pharmacy benefit manager shall attribute any amount paid by
or on behalf of a covered person under subdivision (1) of this subsection (e),
including any third-party payment, financial assistance, discount, discount
card, coupon, or any other reduction in out-of-pocket expenses made by or on
behalf of a covered person for prescription drugs, regardless of whether the
person purchased the drug with or without using coverage for the drug under
any health benefit plan, toward:
(i) the out-of-pocket limits for prescription drug costs under
8 V.S.A. § 4092;
(ii) the covered person’s deductible, if any; and
(iii) to the extent not inconsistent with Sec. 2707 of the Public
Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-6, the annual out-of-pocket maximums
applicable to the covered person’s health benefit plan.
(B) The provisions of subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) relating
to a third-party payment, financial assistance, discount, coupon, or other
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 7 of 10
2026
reduction in out-of-pocket expenses made on behalf of a covered person shall
only apply to a prescription drug:
(i) for which there is no generic drug or interchangeable biological
product, as those terms are defined in section 4601 of this title; or
(ii) for which there is a generic drug or interchangeable biological
product, as those terms are defined in section 4601 of this title, but for which
the covered person has obtained access through prior authorization, a step
therapy protocol, or the pharmacy benefit manager’s or health benefit plan’s
exceptions and appeals process.
(C) The provisions of subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall
apply to a high-deductible health plan only to the extent that it would not
disqualify the plan from eligibility for a health savings account pursuant to
26 U.S.C. § 223.
(D) In order to facilitate the appropriate attribution of amounts paid
by or on behalf of a covered person pursuant to subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (2) for a covered person who purchases a prescription drug without
using the prescription drug coverage available for the drug under the covered
person’s health benefit plan, the pharmacy benefit manager shall:
(i) make readily available on its website a downloadable proof of
payment form for a covered person to use to submit proof of the actual amount
that the covered person paid for the drug; and
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 8 of 10
2026
(ii) provide notice to all covered person at least annually that they
are responsible for providing proof of payment using a downloadable proof of
payment form or another mechanism, if the pharmacy benefit manager elects
to make another mechanism available for submitting proof of payment in
addition to the downloadable form, in order to have their spending properly
attributed to their out-of-pocket limits, deductible, and out-of-pocket
maximums as set forth in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2).
* * *
Sec. 3a. 32 V.S.A. § 111 is amended to read:
§ 111. FINANCIAL LITERACY AND ECONOMIC EMPOWERMENT
TRUST FUND
(a) There is hereby established and created a special fund entitled the
Financial Literacy and Economic Empowerment Trust Fund to be administered
by the State Treasurer. The purpose purposes of the Fund is are:
(1) to promote the adoption of fiscally sound money management
practices by Vermonters through education and outreach efforts that raise
awareness of the need for and benefits of practicing such skills and;
(2) to create opportunities to build and encourage the development of
new financial literacy activities and educational products for Vermont citizens
Vermonters; and
(3) to support other economic empowerment opportunities for
Vermonters.
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 9 of 10
2026
(b) The Fund may receive State appropriations transfers, gifts, grants,
federal funds, and any other funds, both public and private, consistent with this
section. The Funds Monies in the Fund may be expended in accordance with
the trust fund provisions of section 462 of this title for such financial literacy
projects as the Treasurer may direct and to defray costs associated with
administering the Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card Program
established pursuant to 18 V.S.A. chapter 91, subchapter 7, in accordance with
the trust fund provisions of section 462 of this title.
(c) The Treasurer may invest monies in the Fund in accordance with the
provisions of section 434 of this title. All balances in the Fund at the end of
the fiscal year shall be carried forward and shall not revert to the General Fund.
Interest earned shall remain in the Fund. The Treasurer’s annual financial
report to the Governor and the General Assembly shall contain an accounting
of receipts, disbursements, and earnings of the Fund.
Sec. 4. VERMONT PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISCOUNT CARD
PROGRAM; IMPLEMENTATION REPORT
On or before January 15, 2027, the State Treasurer shall report to the
General Assembly regarding implementation of the Vermont Prescription Drug
Discount Card Program established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 91, subchapter 7, as
added by Sec. 1 of this act, as of that date, including any recommendations for
improving the administration of the Program and an estimate of the projected
VT LEG #390204 v.1

No. 132 Page 10 of 10
2026
costs to the State in the event that additional financial support is determined to
be necessary to administer the Program.
Sec. 5. VERMONT PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISCOUNT CARD
PROGRAM; EVALUATION AND START-UP FUNDING
In fiscal year 2027, the sum of $50,000.00 is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Office of the State Treasurer for the costs of developing and
implementing the Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card Program as set
forth in this act.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 15, 2026
VT LEG #390204 v.1